Alaska statutes. Title 31. Oil and Gas.
Article 3. General Provisions.

Sec. 31.05.125.
Regulation of shallow natural gas; relationship of chapter to other laws. [Repealed, § 58 ch 49 SLA 2004.]

Secs. 31.05.130 — 31.05.140.
Levy of Tax and Disposition of Funds. [Repealed, § 2 ch 247 SLA 1970.]

Sec. 31.05.150.
Penalties.

In addition to the penalties in (b) — (e) of this section, a person who violates a provision of this chapter, a regulation adopted under this chapter, or an order, stipulation, or term of a permit issued by the commission is liable for a civil penalty of not more than $100,000 for the initial violation and not more than $10,000 for each day thereafter on which the violation continues.

A person who knowingly commits an act specified in AS

11.46.630(a)

for the purpose of evading a provision of this chapter, a regulation adopted under this chapter, or an order, stipulation, or term of a permit issued by the commission is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

A person who knowingly aids or abets another person in the violation of a provision of this chapter, a regulation adopted under this chapter, or an order, stipulation, or term of a permit issued by the commission is subject to the same penalty as that prescribed in this chapter for the violation by the other person.

In addition to the penalties in (a) — (c) and (e) of this section, the commission may impose a civil penalty for each 1,000 cubic feet of natural gas flared, vented, or otherwise determined to be waste as defined in AS

31.05.170

. The penalty shall be twice the fair market value of the natural gas at the point of waste.

A person who knowingly violates a provision of this chapter, a regulation adopted under this chapter, or an order, stipulation, or term of a permit issued by the commission is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than $10,000 a day for each day of violation.

The commission may assess the civil penalties provided in this section, and, if not paid, the penalties are recoverable by suit filed by the attorney general in the name and on behalf of the commission in the superior court. The payment of a penalty does not relieve a person on whom the penalty is imposed from liability to any other person for damages arising out of the violation.

In determining the amount of a penalty assessed under (a) of this section, the commission shall consider

the extent to which the person committing the violation was acting in good faith in attempting to comply;

the extent to which the person committing the violation acted in a wilful or knowing manner;

the extent and seriousness of the violation and the actual or potential threat to public health or the environment;

the injury to the public resulting from the violation;

the benefits derived by the person committing the violation from the violation;

the history of compliance or noncompliance by the person committing the violation with the provisions of this chapter, the regulations adopted under this chapter, and the orders, stipulations, or terms of permits issued by the commission;

the need to deter similar behavior by the person committing the violation and others similarly situated at the time of the violation or in the future;

the effort made by the person committing the violation to correct the violation and prevent future violations; and

other factors considered relevant to the assessment that are adopted by the commission in regulation.

History.

(§ 12 ch 40 SLA 1955; am § 1 ch 195 SLA 1968; am §§ 2 — 4 ch 86 SLA 1990; am § 14 ch 54 SLA 2007)

Cross references. —

For statement of legislative intent regarding subsection (f), see sec. 1(b), ch. 54, SLA 2007, in the 2007 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For drilling, see 20 AAC 25, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2007 amendment, effective July 13, 2007, repealed and reenacted this section.

Collateral references. —

58 C.J.S. Mines and Minerals § 401 et seq.

Sec. 31.05.160.
Injunctive relief.

Whenever it appears that a person is violating or threatening to violate any provision of this chapter, or any regulation or order of the commission, the commission shall bring suit against that person in the superior court of the judicial district where the violation occurs or is threatened, to restrain the person from continuing the violation or from carrying out the threat of violation. In the suit, the court shall have jurisdiction to grant to the commission, without bond or otherwise undertaking, such prohibitory and mandatory injunctions as the facts warrant.

If the commission fails to bring suit to enjoin a violation or threatened violation within 10 days after receipt of written request to do so by a person who is or will be adversely affected by the violation, the person making the request may bring suit to restrain the violation or threatened violation in the court in which the commission may bring suit. If the court finds that injunctive relief should be granted, the commission shall be made a party and shall be substituted for the person who brought the suit, and the injunction shall be issued as if the commission had at all times been the plaintiff.

History.

(§ 13 ch 40 SLA 1955)

Sec. 31.05.170.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires

“and” includes “or” and “or” includes “and”;

“commission” means the Alaska Oil and Gas Conservation Commission;

“correlative rights” mean the opportunity afforded, so far as it is practicable to do so, to the owner of each property in a pool to produce without waste the owner’s just and equitable share of the oil or gas, or both, in the pool; being an amount, so far as can be practically determined, and so far as can practicably be obtained without waste, substantially in the proportion that the quantity of recoverable oil or gas, or both under the property bears to the total recoverable oil or gas or both in the pool, and for such purposes to use the owner’s just and equitable share of the reservoir energy;

“cubic foot” of natural gas means the volume of gas contained in one cubic foot of space measured at a pressure base of 14.65 pounds per square inch absolute and a temperature base of 60 degrees Fahrenheit;

“field” means a general area which is underlain or appears to be underlain by at least one pool, and includes the underground reservoir containing oil or gas; and the words “pool” and “field” mean the same thing when only one underground reservoir is involved, but “field” unlike “pool” may relate to two or more pools;

“gas” includes all natural gas and all hydrocarbons produced at the wellhead not defined as oil;

“landowner” means the owner of the subsurface estate of the tract affected;

“nonconventional gas” has the meaning given in AS

38.05.965

;

“oil” includes crude petroleum oil and other hydrocarbons regardless of gravity which are produced at the wellhead in liquid form and the liquid hydrocarbons known as distillate or condensate recovered or extracted from gas, other than gas produced in association with oil and commonly known as casinghead gas;

“owner” means the person who has the right to drill into and produce from a pool and to appropriate the oil and gas the person produces from a pool for that person and others;

“person” includes a natural person, corporation, association, partnership, receiver, trustee, executor, administrator, guardian, fiduciary or other representative of any kind, and includes a department, agency or instrumentality of the state or a governmental subdivision of the state;

“pool” means an underground reservoir containing, or appearing to contain, a common accumulation of oil or gas; each zone of a general structure which is completely separated from any other zone in the structure is covered by the term “pool”;

“producer” means the owner of a well or wells capable of producing oil or gas or both;

“regular production” means continuing production of oil or gas from a well into production facilities and transportation to market, but does not include short term testing, evaluation, or experimental pilot production activities that have been approved by permit or order of the commission;

“waste” means, in addition to its ordinary meaning, “physical waste” and includes

the inefficient, excessive, or improper use of, or unnecessary dissipation of, reservoir energy; and the locating, spacing, drilling, equipping, operating or producing of any oil or gas well in a manner which results or tends to result in reducing the quantity of oil or gas to be recovered from a pool in this state under operations conducted in accordance with good oil field engineering practices;

the inefficient above-ground storage of oil; and the locating, spacing, drilling, equipping, operating or producing of an oil or gas well in a manner causing, or tending to cause, unnecessary or excessive surface loss or destruction of oil or gas;

producing oil or gas in a manner causing unnecessary water channeling or coning;

the operation of an oil well with an inefficient gas-oil ratio;

the drowning with water of a pool or part of a pool capable of producing oil or gas, except insofar as and to the extent authorized by the commission;

underground waste;

the creation of unnecessary fire hazards;

the release, burning, or escape into the open air of gas, from a well producing oil or gas, except to the extent authorized by the commission;

the use of gas for the manufacture of carbon black, except as provided in this chapter;

the drilling of wells unnecessary to carry out the purpose or intent of this chapter.

History.

(§ 2 ch 40 SLA 1955; am §§ 2, 3 ch 195 SLA 1968; am §§ 14, 15 ch 160 SLA 1978; am § 3 ch 91 SLA 1984; am § 5 ch 45 SLA 2003; am §§ 6, 58 ch 49 SLA 2004)

Revisor’s notes. —

Reorganized in 1984, 2003, 2004, and 2012 to alphabetize the defined terms.

Administrative Code. —

For production practices, see 20 AAC 25, art. 3.